Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF604.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2382YH (2) 91 cm/ns H.F. 604 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 602.1615 Automated data exchange 1 system. 2 1. The judicial branch shall establish an automated data 3 exchange system between the electronic document management 4 system of the judicial branch and the case management systems 5 used by county attorneys. The judicial branch shall use moneys 6 appropriated annually by the general assembly for the operation 7 of the judicial branch to implement this section. 8 2. The judicial branch shall have a fully functional 9 automated data exchange system within nine months of the 10 effective date of this Act. The judicial branch shall provide 11 to county attorneys any information necessary for the county 12 attorneys to update their case management systems to connect to 13 the automated data exchange system. 14 3. The judicial branch shall submit a progress report to 15 the general assembly on the implementation of the automated 16 data exchange system within six months of the completion of the 17 system. 18 4. This section is repealed July 1, 2028. 19 Sec. 2. APPROPRIATION ââ COUNTY ATTORNEY 20 REIMBURSEMENT. There is appropriated from the general 21 fund of the state to the judicial branch for the fiscal year 22 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 23 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 24 purposes designated: 25 For reimbursement to county attorneys for costs incurred 26 by a county attorney associated with conforming the county 27 attorneyâs case management system to the automated data 28 exchange system: 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 50,000 30 Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in this 31 section that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of 32 the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for 33 expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of the 34 fiscal year that begins July 1, 2028. 35 -1- LSB 2382YH (2) 91 cm/ns 1/ 2 H.F. 604